Utah statutes.
26-39-403.   Exclusions from chapter -- Criminal background checks by an excluded person.

(1)  The provisions and requirements of this chapter do not apply to:

(a)  a facility or program owned or operated by an agency of the United States government;

(b)  group counseling provided by a mental health therapist, as defined in Section 58-60-102, who is licensed to practice in this state;

(c)  a health care facility licensed pursuant to Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection Act;

(d)  care provided to qualifying children by or in the homes of parents, legal guardians, grandparents, brothers, sisters, uncles, or aunts;

(e)  care provided to qualifying children, in the home of the provider, for less than four hours a day or on a sporadic basis, unless that child care directly affects or is related to a business licensed in this state;

(f)  care provided to qualifying children as part of a course of study at or a program administered by an educational institution that is regulated by the boards of education of this state, a private education institution that provides education in lieu of that provided by the public education system, or by a parochial education institution;

(g)  care provided to qualifying children by a public or private institution of higher education, if the care is provided in connection with a course of study or program, relating to the education or study of children, that is provided to students of the institution of higher education;

(h)  care provided to qualifying children at a public school by an organization other than the public school, if:

(i)  the care is provided under contract with the public school or on school property; or

(ii)  the public school accepts responsibility and oversight for the care provided by the organization;

(i)  care provided to qualifying children as part of a summer camp that operates on federal land pursuant to a federal permit;

(j)  care provided by an organization that:

(i)  qualifies for tax exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(ii)  is provided pursuant to a written agreement with:

(A)  a municipality, as defined in Section 10-1-104, that provides oversight for the program; or

(B)  a county that provides oversight for the program; and

(iii)  is provided to children who are over the age of four and under the age of 13; or

(k)  care provided at a residential support program that is licensed by the Department of Human Services.

(2)  A person who is excluded, under Subsection (1), from the provisions and requirements of this chapter, shall conduct a criminal background check on all of the person's employees who have access to a qualifying child to whom care is provided by the person.

